Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-821
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 66-821 to 66-824, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Gasohol shall mean gasoline which contains a minimum of ten percent blend of an agricultural ethyl alcohol whose purity shall be at least ninety-nine percent alcohol, excluding denaturant, produced from cereal grains or domestic agricultural commodities; and

(2) Department shall mean the Department of Transportation.

Laws 1979, LB 74, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 104, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 346, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 242.